Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 17 University of Wyoming

Cross references. —

As to giving instruction in constitutions and passing test for degree, see §§

21-9-102

,

21-9-103

.

For constitutional provisions as to University of Wyoming, see art. 7, §§ 15 to 17, 23 Wyo. Const.

As to exclusion of university from Wyoming Funds Consolidation Act, see §

9-4-215

.

As to university account within permanent land income fund, see §

9-4-308

.

As to distribution of government royalty income to university, see §

9-4-601

.

As to charges for assays for silver, gold, copper and lead at university, see §

30-1-127

.

As to use of human bodies for anatomical study, see §§

35-4-601

to

35-4-607

.

As to office of state chemists at university, see §

35-7-202

.

As to applicability of fire escape provisions to universities, see §

35-9-505

.

As to appointing member of department of anthropology as state archaeologist, see §

36-4-106

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities § 1 et seq.

Tort liability of college, university, fraternity or sorority for injury or death of member or prospective member by hazing or initiation activity, 68 ALR4th 228.

Validity, construction and application of “hazing” statutes, 30 ALR5th 683.

Standing to challenge college or professional school admissions program which gives preference to minority or disadvantaged applicants, 60 ALR Fed 612.

Public institutions of higher learning as “persons” subject to suit under 42 USC § 1983, 65 ALR Fed 490.